HW 3/spanish_verbs.foma
read lexc spanish_verbs.lexc
define Lexicon;
define DeleteInf i r -> 0 || _ "^";
define ChangeStressed e -> i || _ ? "^" [? - [i | I]];
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

regex Lexicon .o.
      DeleteInf .o.
      ChangeStressed .o.
      Cleanup;
